Tennessee, session 114, SB0441.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1359(c), is amended by
adding the following as a new subdivision:
(3) This subsection (c) does not apply to a person who possesses or carries a
firearm into an area where firearms are not permitted under this section if, upon the
request of an individual authorized to control access to the property, the person
immediately leaves the property or stores the firearm in a personal vehicle in accordance
with § 39-17-1313.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0441
001433
- 1 -